Hawaii statutes.
PART III.
UNADMINISTERED SMALL ESTATES;

ESTATES IN
CORONER'S CHARGE--REPEALED

§§531-51 to 61 REPEALED. L 1976, c
200, pt of §1.

Cross References

For present provisions, see §§560:3-1201 to 560:3-1215.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next